Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska35-512
Districts; warrants; amount authorized; rate of interest.

All warrants for payment of any indebtedness of a rural fire protection district which are unpaid for want of funds shall bear interest at a rate specified by the issuing district and endorsed on the warrant, from the date of the registering of such unpaid warrants with the county treasurer; Provided, that the amount of such warrants does not exceed the revenue provided for the year in which the indebtedness was incurred.

Laws 1939, c. 38, § 9, p. 194;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 35-609;

R.S.1943, § 35-409;

Laws 1949, c. 98, § 12, p. 267;

Laws 1969, c. 51, § 102, p. 336.